Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF5086.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [4.033] STATE OF THE STATE; ADDRESS TO LEGISLATURE. new text end new text begin The governor must deliver a state of the state address to the legislature no later than 30 days after the date the regular legislative session convenes each year. new text end